Utah statutes.
17B-1-1206.   Validation petition hearing -- Validation proceedings.

(1)  At each validation petition hearing, the court shall determine all matters and issues affecting the questions raised by the validation petition.

(2)  The district court shall:

(a)  advance each matter pertaining to validation proceedings as a matter of immediate public interest and concern; and

(b)  hear each matter pertaining to validation proceedings at the earliest practicable moment.

(3)  The district court shall disregard each error, irregularity, or omission that does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

(4)  Except as otherwise specified in this part, the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern validation proceedings in matters of pleading and practice before the district court.

